Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.501

Authorization to take physical custody of child.

An order under this chapter directing law enforcement to obtain physical custody of the child from the other parent or a third party holding the child may only be sought pursuant to a writ of habeas corpus under chapter 7.36 RCW.

[ 2001 c 65 s 311.]